Hawaii, session 2026, HB1970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that for over fifty years, the Hawaii tumor registry of the university of Hawaii cancer center has served as a vital public health and research resource for the State and provides support for statutorily mandated cancer surveillance.  The Hawaii tumor registry is part of the National Cancer Institute's Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results Program, which provides approximately eighty per cent of the Hawaii tumor registry's funding, with the remaining twenty per cent coming from the university of Hawaii cancer center in compliance with the federal contract's twenty per cent minimum cost-share requirement. The legislature further finds that restrictions in federal funding jeopardize the ability of the Hawaii tumor registry to continue to provide robust cancer surveillance that is critical to the health of the State's residents.  Due to an overall reduction in National Institutes of Health funding, the Hawaii tumor registry faces a twenty-one per cent reduction in federal funding.  This reduction in funding will be exacerbated by university of Hawaii cancer center funding restrictions, which will negatively impact its ability to meet the twenty per cent cost sharing requirement. The legislature additionally finds that the Hawaii tumor registry has consistently been recognized as a top-performing cancer registry in the United States and across North America.  The impact of the Hawaii tumor registry on the health of Hawaii's residents has been far ranging, and includes working with the department of health to investigate suspected cancer clusters associated with a wide range of exposures, evaluating the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on cancer care in the State, and direct contributions to national cancer research, early detection efforts, and lifesaving legislative initiatives such as the Childhood Cancer STAR Act of 2018 and the National Firefighter Registry for Cancer. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii cancer center to support the ongoing work of the Hawaii tumor registry. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the university of Hawaii tuition and fees special fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii cancer center to support the operations of the Hawaii tumor registry, to be expended as follows: (1)  $ to offset reductions in federal funding; (2)  $ to cover the mandatory minimum twenty per cent cost sharing for federal funding; (3)  $ for the tumor biorepository; and (4)  $ for statewide pathology reporting software. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2055.